ko: 라운더스 관리 기관 승인: NRA 승인; Rounders England 승인; 기타
vi: Sự chấp thuận của cơ quan quản lý môn bóng chày: Được NRA phê duyệt; Được Rounders England phê duyệt; Khác
pt-PT: Aprovação da entidade reguladora do rounders: Aprovado pela NRA; Aprovado pela Rounders England; Outro
hu: Rounders irányító testület jóváhagyása: NRA által jóváhagyott; Rounders England által jóváhagyott; Egyéb
de: Genehmigung durch den Rounders-Verband: NRA-zugelassen; Rounders-England-zugelassen; Sonstige
th: การอนุมัติจากหน่วยงานกำกับดูแลกีฬาราวน์เดอร์ส: ได้รับการรับรองจาก NRA; ได้รับการรับรองจาก Rounders England; อื่นๆ
lt-LT: Rounders valdymo institucijos patvirtinimas: Patvirtinta NRA; Patvirtinta „Rounders England“; Kita
tr: Rounders resmi kurum onayı: NRA Onaylı; Rounders England Onaylı; Diğer
cs: Schválení řídícího orgánu pálkované: Schváleno NRA; Schváleno Rounders England; Jiné
da: Godkendelse fra rundbold-styrelsesorgan: NRA-godkendt; Godkendt af Rounders England; Andet
nb: Godkjenning fra roundersforbund: NRA-godkjent; Godkjent av Rounders England; Annet
it: Approvazione da parte dell'ente di governo del rounders: Approvato NRA; Approvato Rounders England; Altro
sv: Rounders – godkännande från styrande organ: NRA-godkänd; Rounders England-godkänd; Övrigt
zh-CN: 圆场球管理机构认证: NRA 认证; 英格兰圆场棒球协会认证; 其他
fi: Rounders-järjestön hyväksyntä: NRA-hyväksytty; Rounders England -hyväksytty; Muu
en: Rounders governing body approval: NRA Approved; Rounders England Approved; Other
pl: Zatwierdzenie przez organ zarządzający rounders: Zatwierdzone przez NRA; Zatwierdzone przez Rounders England; Inne
nl: Rounders bestuursorgaan goedkeuring: Goedgekeurd door NRA; Goedgekeurd door Rounders England; Overige
hr-HR: Rounders upravno tijelo odobrenje: Odobrio NRA; Odobrio Rounders England; Ostalo
ja: ラウンド競技団体の承認: NRA 承認; Rounders England 承認; その他
pt-BR: Rounders aprovação por órgão regulador: Aprovado pela NRA; Aprovado pela Rounders England; Outro
zh-TW: 繞圈球管理機構核准: NRA 認證; Rounders England 認證; 其他
ru: Одобрение руководящего органа по раундерсу: Одобрено NRA; Одобрено Rounders England; Другое
sk-SK: Schválenie hry rounders riadiacim orgánom: Schválené NRA; Schválené Rounders England; Iné
sl-SI: Odobritev krovne organizacije za rounders: Odobrila zveza NRA; Odobrila zveza Rounders England; Drugo
fr: Homologation par un organisme de rounders: Approuvé par la NRA; Approuvé par Rounders England; Autre
el: Έγκριση από επίσημο φορέα του rounders: Εγκεκριμένο από την NRA; Εγκεκριμένο από τη Rounders England; Άλλο
ro-RO: Aprobare din partea forului decizional pentru rounders: Aprobat de NRA; Aprobat de Rounders England; Altele
es: Aprobación del órgano rector de rounders: Aprobado por NRA; Aprobado por Rounders England; Otro
bg-BG: Одобрение от официалния орган на „Раундърс“: Одобрено от NRA; Одобрено от Rounders England; Друго